test/src/gt-norm-yamls/N-mispiton_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:
  
  Noun - mispiton - ok : # -m inanimate noun
     
     mispiton+N+IN+Sg+Px1Sg: nispiton
     mispiton+N+IN+Sg+Px2Sg: kispiton
     mispiton+N+IN+Sg+Px3Sg: ospiton
     mispiton+N+IN+Sg+Px3iSg: ospitoniyiw
     mispiton+N+IN+Sg+Px1Pl: nispitoninân
     mispiton+N+IN+Sg+Px12Pl: kispitoninaw
     mispiton+N+IN+Sg+Px2Pl: kispitoniwâw
     mispiton+N+IN+Sg+Px3Pl: ospitoniwâw
     mispiton+N+IN+Sg+Px3iPl: ospitoniyiw

     mispiton+N+IN+Pl+Px1Sg: nispitona
     mispiton+N+IN+Pl+Px2Sg: kispitona
     mispiton+N+IN+Pl+Px3Sg: ospitona
     mispiton+N+IN+Pl+Px3iSg: ospitoniyiwa
     mispiton+N+IN+Pl+Px1Pl: nispitoninâna
     mispiton+N+IN+Pl+Px12Pl: kispitoninawa
     mispiton+N+IN+Pl+Px2Pl: kispitoniwâwa
     mispiton+N+IN+Pl+Px3Pl: ospitoniwâwa
     mispiton+N+IN+Pl+Px3iPl: ospitoniyiwa
